Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.025

Commission—Compensation and travel expenses—Frequency of meetings.

The six board members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, plus travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 when they are called into session by the director or when otherwise engaged in the business of the commission. The commission shall meet four times a year or at the call of the director.

[ 2008 c 23 s 8; 1984 c 287 s 49; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 49; 1953 c 235 s 4; 1951 c 222 s 6; 1941 c 252 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8340-37. Formerly RCW 18.85.080.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.